src/fst/affixes/morphology.lexd
###############################################################################
## PATTERNS ##
###############################################################################

PATTERN Morphology
Uninflected
Reduplication
Diminutive
Infixes
Affixes_1
Affixes_2
Affixes_3
Affixes_4
Affixes_5
Affixes_6
Affixes_7
Affixes_8
Affixes_9
Affixes_10
Affixes_11
Affixes_12
Affixes_13

PATTERN Uninflected
Stem(1): :Stem(1) Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4)

PATTERN Infixes                                                                                         ## Includes PluralVA and Instrumental infixation processes
Stem(1): :Stem(1) :Infixes_L(1) :Infixes_L(2) Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) Infixes_L(1):                                                                                     #Simple infixation
Stem(1): :Stem(1) :Infixes_L(1) :Infixes_L(2) :Stem(2) :Stem(3) :Stem(1) Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) Infixes_L(1): Reduplication_L:                                         #Simple infixation with reduplication
Stem(1): :Stem(1) Stem(2) :Instrumental_L(1) :Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) :Instrumental_L(2) Instrumental_L(1):                                                             #Instrumental infixation
Stem(1): :Stem(1) :Stem(2) :Instrumental_L(1) :Stem(2) :Stem(3) :Stem(1) Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) :Instrumental_L(2) Instrumental_L(1): Reduplication_L:                 #Instrumental infixation with reduplication
Stem(1): :Stem(1) Stem(2) :PluralVA_L(1) :Stem(2) :PluralVA_L(2) :Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) PluralVA_L(1):                                                                #Plural infixation
Stem(1): :Stem(1) :Stem(2) :PluralVA_L(1) :Stem(2) :PluralVA_L(2) :Stem(2) :Stem(3) :Stem(1) Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) PluralVA_L(1): Reduplication_L:                    #Plural infixation with reduplication

PATTERN Reduplication
Stem(1): :Stem(1) :Stem(2) :Stem(3) :Stem(1) Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) Reduplication_L:               #Full reduplication

PATTERN Diminutive
:Stem(1) :Diminutive_L Stem(1): :Stem(1) Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) A13_L? Diminutive_L:              #Culu- with optional suffixes
## The next 6 lines are the Dim reduplication with the 6 lines from Infixes_P and optional suffixes
:Stem(1) :Diminutive_L Stem(1): :Stem(1) :Infixes_L(1) :Infixes_L(2) Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) Infixes_L(1): A13_L? Diminutive_L:
:Stem(1) :Diminutive_L Stem(1): :Stem(1) :Infixes_L(1) :Infixes_L(2) :Stem(2) :Stem(3) :Stem(1) Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) Infixes_L(1): Reduplication_L: A13_L? Diminutive_L:
:Stem(1) :Diminutive_L Stem(1): :Stem(1) Stem(2) :Instrumental_L(1) :Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) :Instrumental_L(2) Instrumental_L(1): A13_L? Diminutive_L:
:Stem(1) :Diminutive_L Stem(1): :Stem(1) :Stem(2) :Instrumental_L(1) :Stem(2) :Stem(3) :Stem(1) Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) :Instrumental_L(2) Instrumental_L(1): Reduplication_L: A13_L? Diminutive_L:
:Stem(1) :Diminutive_L Stem(1): :Stem(1) Stem(2) :PluralVA_L(1) :Stem(2) :PluralVA_L(2) :Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) PluralVA_L(1): A13_L? Diminutive_L:
:Stem(1) :Diminutive_L Stem(1): :Stem(1) :Stem(2) :PluralVA_L(1) :Stem(2) :PluralVA_L(2) :Stem(2) :Stem(3) :Stem(1) Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) PluralVA_L(1): Reduplication_L: A13_L? Diminutive_L:

PATTERN Affixes_1
:A1_L Uninflected A1_L: A13_L?
#:A1_L :A2_L? :A4_L? :A5_L? :A6_L? :A7_L? :A10_L? :A11_L? :A12_L? Uninflected A1_L: A2_L:? A4_L:? A5_L:? A6_L:? A7_L:? A10_L:? A11_L:? A12_L:? A13_L?

PATTERN Affixes_2
:A2_L Uninflected A2_L: A13_L?
#:A1_L? :A2_L :A4_L? :A5_L? :A6_L? :A7_L? :A10_L? :A11_L? :A12_L? Uninflected A1_L:? A2_L: A4_L:? A5_L:? A6_L:? A7_L:? A10_L:? A11_L:? A12_L:? A13_L?

PATTERN Affixes_3
:A3_L(1) Uninflected :A3_L(2) A3_L(1): A13_L?
#:A1_L? :A2_L? :A3_L(1) :A4_L? :A5_L? :A6_L? :A7_L? :A10_L? :A11_L? :A12_L? Uninflected A1_L:? A2_L:? A3_L: A4_L:? A5_L:? A6_L:? A7_L:? A10_L:? A11_L:? A12_L:? :A3_L(2) A13_L?

PATTERN Affixes_4
:A4_L Uninflected A4_L: A13_L?
#:A1_L? :A2_L? :A4_L :A5_L? :A6_L? :A7_L? :A10_L? :A11_L? :A12_L? Uninflected A1_L:? A2_L:? A4_L: A5_L:? A6_L:? A7_L:? A10_L:? A11_L:? A12_L:? A13_L?

PATTERN Affixes_5
:A5_L Uninflected A5_L: A13_L?
#:A1_L? :A2_L? :A4_L? :A5_L :A6_L? :A7_L? :A10_L? :A11_L? :A12_L? Uninflected A1_L:? A2_L:? A4_L:? A5_L: A6_L:? A7_L:? A10_L:? A11_L:? A12_L:? A13_L?

PATTERN Affixes_6
:A6_L Uninflected A6_L: A13_L?
#:A1_L? :A2_L? :A4_L? :A5_L? :A6_L :A7_L? :A10_L? :A11_L? :A12_L? Uninflected A1_L:? A2_L:? A4_L:? A5_L:? A6_L: A7_L:? A10_L:? A11_L:? A12_L:? A13_L?

PATTERN Affixes_7
:A7_L Uninflected A7_L: A13_L?
#:A1_L? :A2_L? :A4_L? :A5_L? :A6_L? :A7_L :A10_L? :A11_L? :A12_L? Uninflected A1_L:? A2_L:? A4_L:? A5_L:? A6_L:? A7_L: A10_L:? A11_L:? A12_L:? A13_L?

PATTERN Affixes_8
:A8a_L(1) Stem(1): :Stem(1) :A8a_L(2) Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) A8a_L(1): :A8a_L(3) A13_L?
:A8b_L(1) Stem(1): :Stem(1) :Stem(2) :A8b_L(2) Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) A8b_L(1): :A8b_L(3) A13_L?
:A8c_L(1) Stem(1): :Stem(1) Stem(2) :Stem(1) :Stem(2) Stem(3) Stem(4) A8c_L(1): A8c_L(2) A13_L?

PATTERN Affixes_9
:A9_L(1) Uninflected A9_L(1): A9_L(2) A13_L?
#:A1_L? :A2_L? :A4_L? :A5_L? :A6_L? :A7_L? :A9_L(1) :A10_L? :A11_L? :A12_L? Uninflected A1_L:? A2_L:? A4_L:? A5_L:? A6_L:? A7_L:? A9_L(1): A10_L:? A11_L:? A12_L:? A9_L(2) A13_L?

PATTERN Affixes_10
:A10_L(1) Uninflected A10_L(1): A13_L?              #I have ignored A10_L(2) for now since it's an infix already covered in the other patterns
#:A1_L? :A2_L? :A4_L? :A5_L? :A6_L? :A7_L? :A10_L :A11_L? :A12_L? Uninflected A1_L:? A2_L:? A4_L:? A5_L:? A6_L:? A7_L:? A10_L: A11_L:? A12_L:? A13_L?

PATTERN Affixes_11
:A11_L Uninflected A11_L: A13_L?
#:A1_L? :A2_L? :A4_L? :A5_L? :A6_L? :A7_L? :A10_L? :A11_L :A12_L? Uninflected A1_L:? A2_L:? A4_L:? A5_L:? A6_L:? A7_L:? A10_L:? A11_L: A12_L:? A13_L?

PATTERN Affixes_12
:A12_L Uninflected A12_L: A13_L?
#:A1_L? :A2_L? :A4_L? :A5_L? :A6_L? :A7_L? :A10_L? :A11_L? :A12_L Uninflected A1_L:? A2_L:? A4_L:? A5_L:? A6_L:? A7_L:? A10_L:? A11_L:? A12_L: A13_L?

PATTERN Affixes_13
Uninflected A13_L
#:A1_L? :A2_L? :A4_L? :A5_L? :A6_L? :A7_L? :A10_L? :A11_L? :A12_L? Uninflected A1_L:? A2_L:? A4_L:? A5_L:? A6_L:? A7_L:? A10_L:? A11_L:? A12_L:? A13_L

###############################################################################
## LEXICONS ##
###############################################################################

LEXICON Reduplication_L                     #How to include different stress patterns for these different functions?? Likely will need different patterns for each.
<Aug>:
<Dim>:
<Distr>:
<Iter>:

LEXICON Diminutive_L
<Dim>:ulu                                                               #Diminutive reduplicative prefix Culu-

LEXICON PluralVA_L(2)
<PlAg>:l  :l

LEXICON Instrumental_L(2)
<Nmlz><Ins><ActV>:l     :
<Nmlz><Ins><ObjV>:l     :on
<Nmlz><Ins><RecV>:l     :an

LEXICON Infixes_L(2)                       #Infixes. Other infixes must be coded into the patterns (Vl, CV, etc.)
<Intens>:i              :n
<Ptcp>:i                :n
<Ind><ActV><Real>:u     :m

LEXICON A1_L
<Purp>:pang                         #This pang is not subject to N assimilation

LEXICON A2_L
<Supl>:pinaka

LEXICON A3_L(2)
<V><Ind><ActV><Real><Pfv>:nag          :
<V><Ind><ActV><Real><Ipfv>:naga        :
<V><Ind><ActV><Irr><Pfv>:mag           :
<V><Ind><ActV><Irr><Ipfv>:maga         :
<V><Ind><ObjV><Real><Pfv>:gin          :
<V><Ind><ObjV><Real><Ipfv>:gina        :
<V><Ind><ObjV><Irr><Pfv>:              :on
<V><Ind><ObjV><Irr><Ipfv>:paga         :on
<V><Ind><InsV><Real><Pfv>:gin          :
<V><Ind><InsV><Real><Ipfv>:gina        :
<V><Ind><InsV><Irr><Pfv>:i             :
<V><Ind><InsV><Irr><Ipfv>:iga          :
<V><Ind><RecV><Real><Pfv>:gin          :an
<V><Ind><RecV><Real><Ipfv>:gina        :an
<V><Ind><RecV><Irr><Pfv>:              :an
<V><Ind><RecV><Irr><Ipfv>:paga         :an
<V><Ind><ActV><Real><Hab>:na{N}        :
<V><Ind><ActV><Real><Hab>:na{N}a       :               #This affix is occasionally used instead of na{N} (nangamuyo). Is it phonologically conditioned? Nang+ka?
<V><Ind><ActV><Irr><Hab>:ma{N}         :
<V><Ind><ActV><Irr><Hab>:ma{N}a        :               #This affix is occasionally used instead of ma{N} (mangamuyo). Is it phonologically conditioned? Mang+ka?
<V><Ind><ActV><Real><Coop>:nakig       :
<V><Ind><ActV><Irr><Coop>:makig        :
<V><Deo><ActV><Real>:naka              :
<V><Deo><ActV><Irr>:maka               :
<V><Deo><ObjV><Real>:na                :
<V><Deo><ObjV><Irr>:ma                 :
<V><Deo><InsV><Real>:na                :
<V><Deo><InsV><Irr>:ma                 :
<V><Deo><RecV><Real>:na                :an
<V><Deo><RecV><Irr>:ma                 :an
<Ger>:pag                              :
<V><Imp><ActV>:pag                     :
<V><Imp><ObjV>:pag                     :a
<V><Imp><InsV>:pag-i                   :
<V><Imp><RecV>:pag                     :i
<V><Imp><ObjV>:                        :a
<V><Imp><InsV>:i                       :
<V><Imp><RecV>:                        :i
<V><Imp><ObjV>:pag                     :on
<V><Imp><RecV>:pag                     :an

LEXICON A4_L
<Coop>:pakig
<Ins>:inug
<Mate>:ka                           #Person Nmlz (___ mate) Better tag here?
<Fellow>:isigka                     #Person Nmlz (Fellow ___)Better tag here?

LEXICON A5_L
<Hab>:pa{N}
<Hab>:pa{N}a                        #This affix is occasionally used instead of Pa{N} (Pangabudlay). Is it phonologically conditioned? Pang+ka?

LEXICON A6_L
<Caus>:pa

LEXICON A7_L
<Stat>:ka

LEXICON A8a_L(3)                     #Are there semantic differences between the different Adj. inflections that can be included in the tags?
<A>:ma         :       :
<A>:ma         :       :on
<A>:ma         :in     :on
<A>:           :       :on
<A>:           :       :anon
<A>:           :       :non
<Prosp>:manug  :       :

LEXICON A8b_L(3)
<A><Caus>:maka :l      :           #Maka-VL- adjectives with optional -on (-Vl- will come in pattern)
<A><Caus>:maka :l      :on         #Maka-VL- adjectives with optional -on (-Vl- will come in pattern)

LEXICON A8c_L(2)
<A><Caus>:maka :           #Maka-CV- adjectives (CV will come in pattern)
<A><Caus>:maka :on         #Maka-CV- adjectives (CV will come in pattern)

LEXICON A9_L(2)
<Stat>:ka               :
<Nmlz><Prosp>:ka        :on
<Nmlz><Col>:ka          :an
<Nmlz><Msmt>:ka         :on         #Measurement. Better tag?

LEXICON A10_L(2)
#<Dim>:            :ulu            #This is commented out because although it comes in this order, this pattern is already expressed in the Diminutive pattern
<Nmlz><Area>:tig   :               #Time/Season nouns. Area = Areal (time/place/situation)
<Nmlz><Area>:tag   :               #Optional -Vl- must be coded into the pattern
<Distr>:tag        :
<Mltp>:maka        :
<Ag><Hab>:pala     :
<Ag>:taga          :               #Are taga- ang tag- in free variation? What about other agentive affixes?
<Ag>:tag           :
<Ag>:manug         :

LEXICON A11_L
<Ag>:ma{N}

LEXICON A12_L
<Invol>:ha                          #Invol = Involuntary, accidental
<Invol>:hi
<Ptcp>:ni                           #How to make this (partially?) phonologically conditioned?

LEXICON A13_L
<Recp>:anay
<Recp>:ay                           #Are the two reciprocal suffixes in free variation?
